Washington statutes.
RCW 32.12.120

Adverse claim to a deposit to be accompanied by court order or bond—Exceptions.

Notice to any mutual savings bank doing business in this state of an adverse claim to a deposit standing on its books to the credit of any person shall not be effectual to cause said bank to recognize said adverse claimant unless said adverse claimant shall also either procure a restraining order, injunction, or other appropriate process against said bank from a court of competent jurisdiction in a cause therein instituted by him or her wherein the person to whose credit the deposit stands is made a party and served with summons or shall execute to said bank, in form and with sureties acceptable to it, a bond, in an amount which is double either the amount of said deposit or said adverse claim, whichever is the lesser, indemnifying said bank from any and all liability, loss, damage, costs, and expenses, for and on account of the payment of such adverse claim or the dishonor of the check or other order of the person to whose credit the deposit stands on the books of said bank: PROVIDED, That this law shall not apply in any instance where the person to whose credit the deposit stands is a fiduciary for such adverse claimant, and the facts constituting such relationship as also the facts showing reasonable cause of belief on the part of said claimant that the said fiduciary is about to misappropriate said deposit, are made to appear by the affidavit of such claimant.

This section shall not apply to accounts subject to *chapter 30.22 RCW.

[ 2011 c 336 s 751; 1981 c 192 s 31; 1963 c 176 s 13. Cf. 1961 c 280 s 4; RCW 30.20.090.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Chapter 30.22 RCW was recodified as chapter 30A.22 RCW pursuant to 2014 c 37 s 4, effective January 5, 2015.

Effective date—1981 c 192: See RCW 30A.22.900.